Kentucky, session 2026RS, HB823.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
SECTION 1. A NEW SECTION OF KRS 369.130 TO 369.139 IS CREATED
TO READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) As used in this section, "wallet provider" or "provider" means a person that
offers or provides a wallet.
(2) A wallet provider:
(a) Shall:
1. Provide live customer service via a toll-free telephone number during
operating hours, which shall not be less than the hours between 8:00
a.m. and 10:00 p.m. local time within the Commonwealth; and
2. Provide a mechanism for, and assist any person who owns a wallet
that was provided by the provider with, resetting any password, pin,
seed phrase, or other similar information that is necessary to access
the contents the self-hosted wallet; and
(b) May require any person requesting assistance under paragraph (a)2. of this
subsection to verify the person's identity prior to providing the assistance by
means other than providing the password, pin, seed phrase, or other
information.
(3) (a) A violation of this section shall be deemed to be an unfair, false, misleading,
or deceptive act or practice in the conduct of trade or commerce in violation
of KRS 367.170.
(b) All of the remedies, powers, and duties provided to the Attorney General or
any other person under KRS 367.110 to 367.300, and the penalties provided
in KRS 367.990, pertaining to acts and practices declared unlawful by KRS
367.170, shall apply with equal force and effect to a violation of this section.
(4) (a) The remedies and penalties prescribed in this section shall be cumulative.
Page 1 of 2
XXXX 3/3/2026 9:34 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2476
(b) This section shall not be construed to limit or restrict the powers, duties,
remedies, or penalties available to the Attorney General, the
Commonwealth, or any other person under any other statutory or common
law.
(5) The Attorney General may promulgate administrative regulations in accordance
with KRS Chapter 13A necessary to effectuate, or as an aid to the effectuation of,
the proper enforcement of this section.
Page 2 of 2
XXXX 3/3/2026 9:34 AM Jacketed